test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-nimi35_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nimi: # Noun nimi 'eng name /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nimi+N+Sg+Nom: nimi
     nimi+N+Sg+Gen: nime
     nimi+N+Sg+Par: nimme
     nimi+N+Sg+Ill: nimme
     nimi+N+Sg+Ine: [nimen, nimeh, nimehn]
     nimi+N+Sg+Ela: nimest
     nimi+N+Sg+All: nimele
     nimi+N+Sg+Ade: nimel
     nimi+N+Sg+Abl: nimelt
     nimi+N+Sg+Tra: nimes
     nimi+N+Sg+Ter: nimeniq
     nimi+N+Sg+Abe: nimeldäq
     nimi+N+Sg+Com: nimegaq
     nimi+N+Pl+Nom: nimeq
     nimi+N+Pl+Gen: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Par: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Ill: [nimmihe, nimmi, nimmide]
     nimi+N+Pl+Ine: [nimin, nimih, nimihn, nimmin, nimmih, nimmihn]
     nimi+N+Pl+Ela: [nimist, nimmist]
     nimi+N+Pl+All: [nimile, nimmile]
     nimi+N+Pl+Ade: [nimil, nimmil]
     nimi+N+Pl+Abl: [nimilt, nimmilt]
     nimi+N+Pl+Tra: [nimis, nimmis]
     nimi+N+Pl+Ter: [niminiq, nimminiq]
     nimi+N+Pl+Abe: [nimildäq, nimmildäq]
     nimi+N+Pl+Com: nimmigaq
